src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
а (->) А, б (->) Б, в (->) В, г (->) Г, д (->) Д, е (->) Е, ж (->) Ж, 
з (->) З, и (->) И, й (->) Й, к (->) К, л (->) Л, м (->) М, н (->) Н, 
о (->) О, п (->) П, р (->) Р, с (->) С, т (->) Т, у (->) У, ф (->) Ф, 
х (->) Х, ц (->) Ц, ч (->) Ч, ш (->) Ш, щ (->) Щ, ъ (->) Ъ, ы (->) Ы, 
ь (->) Ь, э (->) Э, ю (->) Ю, я (->) Я, ё (->) Ё, ӈ (->) Ӈ,
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G,
h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z || .#. _ ;
